District of Columbia statutes.
8-1841.05

Notification requirements.

An individual, business, or entity that utilizes a commercial guard dog shall notify the Mayor, in writing, as to the presence of the animal and shall provide contact information for the entity responsible for the animal and a 24-hour emergency telephone number.

History

Dec. 5, 2008, D.C. Law 17-281, § 405, 55 DCR 9186